Georgia, session 2025_26, HB149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Healthy Mothers Now Act."
SECTION 2.
Chapter 2A of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the Department
of Public Health, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"31-2A-21.
(a) For purposes of this Code section, the term:
H. B. 149
- 1 -

LC 52 0600
(1) 'Limited maternity care county' means a county in this state that has fewer than two
hospitals or birth centers offering obstetric care or fewer than 60 obstetric providers per
10,000 births.
(2) 'Maternity care desert' means a county in this state that does not have a hospital or
birth center offering obstetric care or an obstetric provider.
(3) 'Obstetric provider' means a licensed physician or licensed advanced practice
registered nurse who practices in obstetrics and gynecology.
(4) 'Postpartum care' means healthcare for a woman for a period of one year following
a birth, miscarriage, stillbirth, or neonatal death. Such term includes physiological
assessments, mental health evaluations, nutritional evaluations, and guidance on personal
and newborn care. Such term includes at least four visits with an obstetric provider as
follows:
(A) An initial visit within 24 hours of a birth, miscarriage, stillbirth, or neonatal death;
(B) A follow-up visit within the first three weeks postpartum;
(C) A follow-up visit within the first eight weeks postpartum;
(D) A comprehensive visit no later than 12 weeks postpartum; and
(E) Intermediary and ongoing care as needed.
(b) The department shall conduct a three-year pilot program for the purpose of providing
postpartum care through mobile health clinics in limited maternity care counties and
maternity care deserts.
(c) No later than June 30, 2026, and annually for the duration of the pilot program, the
department shall submit a detailed written report on the implementation and effectiveness
of the pilot program to the Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the
President of the Senate, and the chairpersons of the House Committee on Public Health and
the Senate Health and Human Services Committee. The final report shall include
recommendations as to expansion of the pilot program state wide and changes to state law
or policy relative to such recommendations.
H. B. 149
- 2 -

LC 52 0600
(d) This Code section shall be contingent upon appropriations made by the General
Assembly specifically for the department for such purposes and shall stand repealed by
operation of law on June 30, 2029."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 149
- 3 -